Tennessee, session 114, SB0672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-307(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2), a violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a
Class E felony.
(2) A violation of subdivision (a)(1), in which the defendant intentionally obstructs
a highway, street, or other place used for the passage of vehicles or conveyances is a
Class D felony.
(3) A violation of subdivision (a)(2) is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0672
000824
- 1 -